src-fst-morphology-affixes-quantifiers.lexc.md
Quantifier inflection
Livvi Karelian quantifiers inflect for case.

**LEXICON NUM_MUARJU** muarju:muarja

**LEXICON NUM_MILJOUNU** muarju:muarja

LEXICON NUM_YKSI yksi:y
* @U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@hte%^WGStem ORD_01_FRONT ; This cannot be final

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI kaksi:ka
* @U.NUM-CARD.WAS@:@U.NUM-CARD.WAS@hte%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ; This cannot be final

LEXICON NUM_SEIČČIE seiččie:seičče

LEXICON NUM_NELLI nelli:nell

LEXICON NUM_KAHEKSA kaheksa:kaheksa

LEXICON NUM_YHEKSÄ yheksä:yheksä

LEXICON NUM_TUHAT tuhat:tuha
LEXICON NUM_TUHAT_01 tuhat:tuha

LEXICON NUM_KUUZI kuuzi:kuud

LEXICON NUM_VIIZI viizi:viid

LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE kymmene:kymmen
LEXICON NUM_KYMMENE_01 kymmene:kymmen

LEXICON NUM_KOLME 

LEXICON ORD_TOINE toine:to

LEXICON ORD_KARJALAINE enzimäine:ensimä

LEXICON ORD_LIYGILÄINE enzimäine:ensimä

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc)</small>
